Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-938
Other remedies.

A protected individual who pursues remedies under the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act is not precluded from pursuing other legal or equitable remedies against the respondent.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 96.